dev/bm.adj.dix
<pardef n="øyd/e__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="glip/pe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pa</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pede</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pen</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pete</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pete</l>      <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pet</l>       <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tep/pe__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>pende</l>     <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>pe<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sop/pen__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pen</l>       <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pent</l>      <r>pen<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tr/ekke__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ekkende</l>   <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukken</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>      <r>ekke<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lum/mer__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>       <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mert</l>      <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rere</l>      <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reste</l>     <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rest</l>      <r>mer<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
	</pardefs>

<e lm="grøppe">          <i>grøp</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hippen">          <i>hip</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gjennomtrekke">   <i>gjennomtr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortrekke">       <i>fortr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fratrekke">       <i>fratr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="heppen">          <i>hep</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forhippen">       <i>forhip</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="glippe">          <i>glip</i><par n="glip/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="andsluppen">      <i>andslup</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="foretrekke">      <i>foretr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="teppe">           <i>tep</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skinntrekke">     <i>skinntr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tiltrekke">       <i>tiltr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="snuppen">         <i>snup</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="snauklyppe">      <i>snauklyp</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skamklyppe">      <i>skamklyp</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="soppen">          <i>sop</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sprekke">         <i>spr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skreppe">         <i>skrep</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trekke">          <i>tr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="øyde">            <i>øyd</i><par n="øyd/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="laussluppen">     <i>lausslup</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sammentrekke">    <i>sammentr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lummer">          <i>lum</i><par n="lum/mer__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kjeppen">         <i>kjep</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="klyppe">          <i>klyp</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="semmer">          <i>sem</i><par n="lum/mer__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kreppen">         <i>krep</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="prippen">         <i>prip</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overtrekke">      <i>overtr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kveppen">         <i>kvep</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="inntrekke">       <i>inntr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="maskinklyppe">    <i>maskinklyp</i><par n="tep/pe__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ombrekke">        <i>ombr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
<e lm="løssluppen">      <i>løsslup</i><par n="sop/pen__adj"/></e>
<e lm="overstrekke">     <i>overstr</i><par n="tr/ekke__adj"/></e>
